North Dakota, session 69, SB2149.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 15.1-36-08 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
15.1-36-08. School construction assistance revolving loan fund - Bank of North Dakota -
School construction projects - Continuing appropriation.
1. The school construction assistance revolving loan fund is a special revolving loan fund
administered by the Bank of North Dakota. The fund consists of all moneys appropriated or
transferred to the fund by the legislative assembly, all interest or other earnings of the fund,
and all repayments of loans made from the fund.
2. Moneys in the fund, interest upon the moneys in the fund, and payments to the fund of
principal and interest are appropriated to the Bank of North Dakota on a continuing basis for
the purpose of providing low-interest school construction loans and for paying administrative
costs, in accordance with this section.
3. ToFor a school construction project not located on an air force base, to be eligible for a loan
under this section, the board of a school district shall:
a. Propose a new construction or remodeling project with a cost of at least one million
dollars and an expected utilization of at least thirty years;
b. Obtain the approval of the superintendent of public instruction for the project under
section 15.1-36-01;
c. (1) Publish in the official newspaper of the district the information regarding the
proposed estimated additional millage and the dollar increase per one thousand
dollars of taxable valuation in accordance with section 21-03-13 along with the
notice of the election in accordance with section 21-03-12 or along with the initial
resolution in accordance with subsection 7 of section 21-03-07; and
(2) Post the information on the school district's website before the date of the election
or during the protest period in accordance with chapter 21-03;
d. Receive authorization for a bond issue in accordance with chapter 21-03; and
e. Submit a completed application to the Bank of North Dakota.
4. For a school construction project located on an air force base, to be eligible for a loan under
this section, the board of the school district shall:
a. Propose a new construction or remodeling project on an air force base which has a cost
of at least one million dollars and an expected utilization of at least thirty years ;
b. Obtain the approval of the superintendent of public instruction for the project under
section 15.1 - 36 - 01 ;

S. B. NO. 2149 - PAGE 2
c. Obtain all necessary federal authorizations and funding commitments for the project; and
d. Submit a completed application to the Bank.
5. The superintendent of public instruction shall designate, until June 30, 2027, or until a loan is
made as identified in this section, twenty million dollars of funds available for loans in the
school construction assistance revolving loan fund for a loan to provide matching funds for the
construction of facilities on an air force base.
6. The superintendent of public instruction shall review loan applications based on a prioritization
system that includes a review of all applications filed during the twelve-month period
preceding April first and gives consideration to:
a. Student occupancy and academic needs in the district;
b. The age of existing structures to be replaced or remodeled;
c. Building design proposals that are based on safety and vulnerability assessments;
d. Community support;
e. Cost; and
f. Any other criteria established by the superintendent of public instruction, after
consultation with an interim committee appointed by the legislative management.
5.7. If the superintendent of public instruction approves the loan, the Bank of North Dakota shall
issue a loan from the school construction assistance revolving loan fund. For a loan made
under this section:
a. If the school construction project totals less than seventy-five million dollars, the
maximum loan amount for which a school district may qualify is fifteen million dollars.
However, if a school district's unobligated general fund balance on the preceding June
thirtieth exceeds the limitation under section 15.1-27-35.3, the loan amount under this
section may not exceed eighty percent of the project's cost up to a maximum loan
amount of twelve million dollars;
b. If the school construction project totals seventy-five million dollars or more, the maximum
loan amount for which a school district may qualify is thirty million dollars. However, if a
school district's unobligated general fund balance on the preceding June thirtieth
exceeds the limitation under section 15.1-27-35.3, the loan amount under this section
may not exceed eighty percent of the project's cost up to a maximum loan amount of
twenty-four million dollars;
c. If the school construction project is on an air force base, the maximum loan amount for
which the school district may qualify is the lesser of twenty percent of the project cost or
twenty million dollars;
d. The term of the loan is twenty years, unless the board of the school district requests a
shorter term in the written loan application; and
d.e. The interest rate of the loan may not exceed two percent per year.
e.f. A district with a school construction loan secured on the open bond market may apply to
refinance the loan when callable with the school construction assistance revolving loan
fund under this subsection.
f. A district that qualifies for a loan under subdivision a, which was approved for a loan of
up to ten million dollars for a construction project bid after January 1, 2021, and before

S. B. NO. 2149 - PAGE 3
June 30, 2024, may apply for a loan in an amount equal to the difference between fifteen
million dollars and the amount of the approved loan. Districts qualifying under this
subdivision may submit an application for additional funding to the superintendent of
public instruction before August 1, 2023.
g. A district that qualifies for a loan under subdivision b, which was approved for a loan of
up to ten million dollars for a construction project bid after January 1, 2021, and before
June 30, 2024, may apply for a loan in an amount equal to the difference between thirty
million dollars and the amount of the approved loan. Districts qualifying under this
subdivision may submit an application for additional funding to the superintendent of
public instruction before August 1, 2023.
6.8. The Bank may adopt policies and establish guidelines to administer this loan program in
accordance with this section. The Bank of North Dakota may use a portion of the interest paid
on the outstanding loans as a servicing fee to pay for administration costs which may not
exceed one-half of one percent of the amount of the interest payment. The Bank of North
Dakota shall deposit principal and interest payments made by school districts for loans under
this section in the school construction assistance revolving loan fund. The fund must be
audited annually pursuant to section 6-09-29, and the cost of the audit must be paid from the
fund.
SECTION 2. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

S. B. NO. 2149 - PAGE 4
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2149 and that two-thirds of the
members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of
said law.
Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State